New York, session 2025-2026, S6703.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "ready-to-drink cocktail retail sales act". 3 § 2. Section 3 of the alcoholic beverage control law is amended by 4 adding a new subdivision 23-a to read as follows: 5 23-a. "Ready-to-drink cocktail" or "RTD cocktail" means a beverage 6 containing liquor which is added to concentrated or unconcentrated 7 juice, flavoring material, water, citric acid, sugar, or carbon dioxide, 8 that contains not more than eight and one-half percent alcohol by 9 volume, and that is sold in single serving containers with a size no 10 greater than sixteen ounces each. 11 § 3. The alcoholic beverage control law is amended by adding a new 12 section 70 to read as follows: 13 § 70. Sale of ready-to-drink cocktails by retail licensees. Each 14 retail licensee under this chapter shall have the right, by virtue of 15 their license and without being required to pay any additional fee for 16 the privilege, to sell at retail for consumption on or off the premises, 17 as the case may be, ready-to-drink cocktails purchased from a person EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10959-09-5 S. 6703--B 2 1 licensed to produce or sell liquor, wine, or beer at wholesale under 2 this chapter. 3 § 4. The section heading, paragraph f of subdivision 1, and subdivi- 4 sions 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8 of section 101-aaa of the alcoholic bever- 5 age control law, the section heading, paragraph f of subdivision 1 and 6 subdivisions 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8 as added by section 183 of part A of chap- 7 ter 389 of the laws of 1997, subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 745 of 8 the laws of 2019, and subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 499 of the 9 laws of 2004, are amended to read as follows: 10 Terms of sale; beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cock- 11 tails, or wine products. 12 f. "Retail licensee" means a person licensed pursuant to this chapter 13 who purchases beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cock- 14 tails, and/or wine products for resale for on or off premises consump- 15 tion, except a person licensed to sell liquor and/or wine for off prem- 16 ises consumption. 17 2. No manufacturer or wholesaler licensed under this chapter shall 18 sell or deliver any beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink 19 cocktails, or wine products to any retail licensee except as provided 20 for in this section: 21 (a) for cash to be paid at the time of delivery; 22 (b) on terms requiring payment by such retail licensee for such beer, 23 mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cocktails, or wine products 24 on or before the final payment date of any credit period within which 25 delivery is made; or 26 (c) by business payment card; provided that a manufacturer or whole- 27 saler that exercises reasonable diligence to ensure the sale comports 28 with the requirements of this section shall not be found to have 29 violated this subdivision where a retail licensee uses a credit card 30 other than a business payment card. 31 Provided, however, that the sale of ready-to-drink cocktails, wine 32 products, mead, or cider to a retail licensee by a wholesaler licensed 33 under section fifty-eight, sixty-two, or seventy-eight of this chapter, 34 or a licensed manufacturer of liquor, mead or wine or a cider producer's 35 license, shall be governed by the provisions of section one hundred-one- 36 aa of this article. 37 3. Each such manufacturer and wholesaler shall, on or before the 38 respective delinquent notice date, give written notice of default, by 39 first class mail, to all such licensees who have failed to make payment 40 to the manufacturer or wholesaler on or before their final payment date 41 for beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cocktails, or wine 42 products sold or delivered to such licensees during the previous credit 43 period. Any such retail licensee receiving such notice shall not there- 44 after purchase beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cock- 45 tails, or wine products except for cash until such time as the authority 46 determines that its name shall not be published on the delinquent list 47 as provided in this subdivision, or until such time as the authority 48 permits sales or deliveries to such licensee as provided in subdivision 49 five of this section. Each such manufacturer and wholesaler shall file 50 with the authority, on or before each notification date, copies of the 51 notices sent by it to all delinquent retail licensees, and in addition, 52 if the authority shall so require, a written list setting forth the 53 names and addresses of all such delinquent licensees. The authority, in 54 its discretion, may extend for a period not exceeding three days the 55 date for giving written notice of default to delinquent retail licensees 56 and extend for three days the date for filing with the authority the S. 6703--B 3 1 copies of notices sent to such licensees and/or the written list of 2 delinquent retail licensees. The authority shall, as soon as practicable 3 after each notification date, compile, publish, and furnish each 4 manufacturer and wholesaler licensed under this chapter a delinquent 5 list containing the names and addresses of all retail licensees who have 6 been reported by manufacturers and wholesalers pursuant to the 7 provisions of this section or section one hundred one-aa of this article 8 as having failed to make payment as required by this section or section 9 one hundred one-aa of this article for beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, 10 ready-to-drink cocktails, or wine products sold or delivered to them, 11 and no such manufacturer or wholesaler, on or after the fifth day after 12 the receipt of such delinquent list, shall knowingly, [wilfully] will- 13 fully or intentionally sell or deliver any beer, mead and/or braggot, 14 cider, ready-to-drink cocktails, or wine products to any such licensee 15 whose name appears on such list, except for cash, until such time as the 16 name of such licensee is removed therefrom, except as otherwise permit- 17 ted by this section. The receipt of a delinquent list by a manufacturer 18 or wholesaler shall constitute knowledge of the names of the retail 19 licensees who have failed to make payment for beer or wine products as 20 required by this section. The failure of any manufacturer or wholesaler 21 to comply with the provisions of this section may, at the discretion of 22 the authority, subject the license of such manufacturer or wholesaler to 23 suspension for not more than five days for the first offense, and not 24 more than thirty days for a subsequent offense. The authority may 25 publish the delinquent list on its website; provided, however, that 26 access shall be restricted to those manufacturers and wholesalers 27 licensed under this chapter. Such publication shall be considered 28 receipt thereof by all manufacturers and wholesalers. 29 4. In the event that any dispute shall exist between any manufacturer 30 or wholesaler and a retail licensee to whom such manufacturer or whole- 31 saler shall have sold beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink 32 cocktails, or wine products, either as to the fact of payment or as to 33 the amount due for such beer or wine products or as to the quantity of 34 the beer or wine products sold or delivered, which dispute cannot be 35 adjusted between them, the authority is authorized to receive statements 36 from each of the parties to such dispute as to the facts and circum- 37 stances thereof and to determine whether or not such retail licensee's 38 name should be published on the delinquent list. 39 5. The authority in the case of a retail licensee who has actually 40 made payment for beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cock- 41 tails, or wine products, or on good cause shown to it, may permit sales 42 or deliveries to any [retial] retail licensee who has received notice of 43 default or who is named on any delinquent list, on terms other than for 44 cash, but within the limitations of this section, prior to the publica- 45 tion of the next delinquent list. 46 6. The license of any retail licensee who purchases or accepts deliv- 47 ery of beer, mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cocktails, or 48 wine products on any terms, other than as provided in this section, may 49 be suspended for not more than five days for the first offense and not 50 more than thirty days for a subsequent offense. The failure of any such 51 retail licensee to pay any amount in default before the expiration of 52 the period of suspension shall be deemed and punishable as a subsequent 53 offense until paid. In addition, the authority may require any such 54 retail licensee, after default in making payment in accordance with the 55 provisions of this section to make payment in cash for beer, mead and/or S. 6703--B 4 1 braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cocktails, or wine products subsequently 2 delivered. 3 7. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require any 4 manufacturer or wholesaler to extend credit to any retail licensee nor 5 to restrain any manufacturer or wholesaler from seeking to enforce by 6 legal action or otherwise, payment of any sum or sums of money due or 7 alleged to be due to any such manufacturer or wholesaler for beer, mead 8 and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cocktails, or wine products sold 9 or delivered to any such retail licensee. 10 8. There shall be paid to the liquor authority by each person applying 11 after the effective date of this section for any license to sell beer, 12 mead and/or braggot, cider, ready-to-drink cocktails, or wine products 13 to retailers or upon the renewal of such license, a sum equivalent to 14 ten per centum of the annual license fee prescribed by this chapter for 15 each such licensee. Such moneys shall be used by the authority to defray 16 the expenses incurred in the administration of this section. 17 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 19 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 20 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made, including by 21 emergency, and completed on or before such effective date.